Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA NICE HOMESHARE PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency must establish and administer the Minnesota Nice HomeShare pilot program to award a grant under this section. The commissioner shall award a grant for assisting seniors in the counties of Lake, St. Louis, and Washington to reduce living expenses by matching seniors who own homes with spare rooms to adults in need of affordable housing. For the purposes of this section, "senior" means a person 55 years of age or older. The commissioner may partner with the Arrowhead Area Agency on Aging and AARP Minnesota to promote the program. new text end new text begin (b) A grantee must: new text end new text begin (1) assist hosts and renters over the telephone, through a text chat function or by video; new text end new text begin (2) collect and process rental payments from renters and distribute payments to hosts in a timely manner; new text end new text begin (3) protect the private information and data of hosts and renters; new text end new text begin (4) conduct background checks on hosts and renters, including contacting at least two references for each host and renter; new text end new text begin (5) acquire from renters employment verification or proof of school enrollment; and new text end new text begin (6) review and process all applications. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin MINNESOTA NICE HOMESHARE PILOT PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for the Minnesota Nice HomeShare pilot program in section 1. new text end